Utah statutes.
58-54-2.   Definitions.
In addition to the definition in Section 58-1-102, as used in this chapter:
(1)  "Board" means the Radiology Technologist Licensing Board established
under this chapter.
(2)  "Practice of radiologic technology" means using radiation from a
radioactive substance, radiology equipment, or any other source, in amounts
beyond normal background levels, for diagnostic or therapeutic purposes on
humans.
(3)  "Radiologist" means a physician certified by the American Board of
Radiology, the American Osteopathic Board of Radiology, the British Royal
College of Radiology, or the Canadian College of Physicians and Surgeons.
(4)  "Radiology equipment" means any medical radiation device that emits
ionizing or nonionizing radiation or detects that radiation for the purpose or
intended purpose of:
(a)  diagnosing disease or other medical conditions in humans; or
(b)  treating, curing, mitigating, or preventing disease in humans.
(5)  "Radiology practical technician" means a person licensed under this
chapter to engage in a practice of radiologic technology performing limited
diagnostic radiology procedures:
(a)  as defined and permitted by rule in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and
(b)  under the supervision of a radiologist or radiology practitioner.
(6)  "Radiology practitioner" means any person or individual licensed in this
state as a physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician, podiatric physician,
chiropractic physician, dentist, dental hygienist, or a physician's assistant,
nurse practitioner, or nurse specialist practicing under the supervision of an
approved supervising physician and in accordance with an approved protocol and
utilization plan.
(7)  "Radiology technologist" means a person licensed under this chapter to
engage in the practice of radiology technology under the supervision of a
radiologist or radiology practitioner including the administration of
parenteral contrast media, radionucleides, and other medications incidental to
radiology procedures provided the administrations are under the direct
supervision of a qualified physician and the technologist is currently
certified in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and appropriate patient care
procedures.
(8)  "Unlawful conduct" as defined in Section 58-1-501 includes:
(a)  using any of the following titles if not licensed as a radiology
technologist under this chapter:
(i)  radiology practical technician;
(ii)  radiology technologist;
(iii)  medical radiographer;
(iv)  radiation therapist; or
(v)  nuclear medicine technologist; and
(b)  using the title "radiology practical technician" if not licensed as a
radiology practical technician under this chapter.
(9)  "Unprofessional conduct" as defined in Section 58-1-501 and as may be
further defined by rule includes:
(a)  any act or omission by a person licensed under this chapter that is
contrary to the instructions of the radiologist or radiology practitioner
responsible for supervising the licensee and which does or reasonably could
pose a threat to the health, safety, or welfare of a patient or any other
person;
(b)  operating any radiology equipment that is known to be unsafe or not in
compliance with all applicable state requirements regulating radiology
equipment;
(c)  permitting any person to operate any radiology equipment who is not
permitted to do so under provisions of law or who is incompetent to operate
radiology equipment for any reason;
(d)  revealing to any unauthorized person any information considered
confidential or privileged regarding any patient;
(e)  the use of any controlled substance as defined by the statutes of this
state except to the extent the controlled substance is lawfully prescribed to
the licensee and used in accordance with the instructions of the prescribing
practitioner; and
(f)  willfully and intentionally or negligently making any false statement or
entry on any patient record or upon any record used to facilitate payment for
radiology services.
